src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-kamrded_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kåʹmrded: # Verb 'to bow / kumartaa' - full paradigm
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [kåʹmrdam, kååʹmmrdam]
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [kåʹmrdak, kååʹmmrdak]
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kååʹmmard
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [kåʹmrdep, kååʹmmrdep]
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [kåʹmrdeʹped, kååʹmmrdeʹped]
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [kåʹmrde, kååʹmmrde]
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: [kåʹmrdet, kååʹmmrdet]

     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [kåʹmrdem, kååʹmmrdem]
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kåʹmrdiǩ, kååʹmmrdiǩ]
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [kåʹmrdi, kååʹmmrdi]
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kåʹmrdim, kåʹmrdin, kååʹmmrdim, kååʹmmrdiim, kåʹmrdiim, kååʹmmrdin, kååʹmmrdiin, kåʹmrdiin]
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kåʹmrdid, kååʹmmrdid, kååʹmmrdiid, kåʹmrdiid]
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kåʹmrde, kååʹmmrde]
     kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: [kåʹmrdeš, kååʹmmrdeš]

     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+Sg1: [kåʹmrdeʹžem, kååʹmmrdeʹžem]
     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+Sg2: [kåʹmrdeʹžiǩ, kååʹmmrdeʹžiǩ]
     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+Sg3: [kåʹmrdež, kååʹmmrdež]
     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+Pl1: [kåʹmrdeʹžep, kååʹmmrdeʹžep, kåʹmrdeʹžim, kåʹmrdeʹžin, kååʹmmrdeʹžim, kååʹmmrdeʹžin]
     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+Pl2: [kåʹmrdeʹžid, kååʹmmrdeʹžid]
     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+Pl3: [kåʹmrdeʹže, kååʹmmrdeʹže]
     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+Sg4: [kåʹmrdeʹžet, kååʹmmrdeʹžet]
     kåʹmrded+V+Pot+ConNeg: [kåʹmrdeʹže, kååʹmmrdeʹže]

     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+Sg1: [kåʹmrdeʹčem, kååʹmmrdeʹčem]
     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+Sg2: [kåʹmrdeʹčiǩ, kååʹmmrdeʹčiǩ, kååʹmmrdeʹčeǩ, kåʹmrdeʹčeǩ]
     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+Sg3: [kåʹmrdeʹči, kååʹmmrdeʹči]
     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+Pl1: [kåʹmrdeʹčim, kååʹmmrdeʹčin, kåʹmrdeʹčin, kååʹmmrdeʹčim, kåʹmrdeʹčep, kååʹmmrdeʹčep]
     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+Pl2: [kåʹmrdeʹčid, kååʹmmrdeʹčid]
     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+Pl3: [kåʹmrdeʹče, kååʹmmrdeʹče]
     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+Sg4: [kåʹmrdeʹčeš, kååʹmmrdeʹčeš]
     kåʹmrded+V+Cond+ConNeg: [kåʹmrdeʹče, kååʹmmrdeʹče]

     kåʹmrded+V+Imprt+Sg2: kååʹmmerd 
     kåʹmrded+V+Imprt+Sg3: [kåʹmrdââǥǥas, kååʹmmrdââǥǥas]
     kåʹmrded+V+Imprt+Pl1: [kåʹmrdâkap, kååʹmmrdâkap]
     kåʹmrded+V+Imprt+Pl2: [kåʹmrdeʹǩed, kååʹmmrdeʹǩed]
     kåʹmrded+V+Imprt+Pl3: [kåʹmrdâkaz, kååʹmmrdâkaz]
     kåʹmrded+V+Imprt+ConNegII: [kåʹmrduku, kååʹmmrduku]
     kåʹmrded+V+Actio+Ess: [kåʹmrdeʹmmen, kååʹmmrdeʹmmen]
     kåʹmrded+V+Actio: [kåʹmrdem, kååʹmmrdem]
     kåʹmrded+V+Act+PrsPrc: [kåʹmrdeei, kååʹmmrdeei]
     kåʹmrded+V+Act+PrfPrc: [kåʹmrdam, kåʹmrdamma, kååʹmmrdam, kååʹmmrdamma]
     kåʹmrded+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [kåʹmrdummu, kåʹmrduum, kåʹmrdum, kååʹmmrdummu, kååʹmmrduum, kååʹmmrdum]
# deduced from Sammallahti/Mosnikoff 1991 -ummu, -uum and -um occur as variants
     kåʹmrded+V+VAbess: [kåʹmrdeǩâni, kåʹmrdeǩeânai, kååʹmmrdeǩeânai, kåʹmrdekani, kååʹmmrdeǩenai, kåʹmrdeǩânai, kåʹmrdeǩeânnai, kåʹmrdeǩenai, kååʹmmrdeǩeânnai, kåʹmrdeǩani, kååʹmmrdeǩani, kååʹmmrdekâni, kååʹmmrdeǩânai, kååʹmmrdekani, kååʹmmrdeǩâni, kåʹmrdekâni]
     kåʹmrded+V+Ger+Ess: [kåʹmrdeeʹn, kååʹmmrdeeʹn]
     kåʹmrded+V+Ger+Instr: [kåʹmrdeeʹl, kååʹmmrdeeʹl]
